North Dakota statutes. TITLE 25 Mental and Physical Illness or Disability
CHAPTER 25-07 Education of Deaf Persons

25-07-01.
School for the deaf — Maintained — Location — Purpose.

There must be maintained at Devils Lake, in Ramsey County, a school for the deaf, which may provide education and training and serve as a resource and referral center for individuals who are deaf or hearing impaired.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 161, § 1; 1893, ch. 123, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 951; R.C. 1899, § 951; R.C. 1905, § 1133; C.L. 1913, § 1680; R.C. 1943, § 25-0701; S.L. 1971, ch. 162, § 6; 2005, ch. 251, § 1.

Cross-References.

Cruel treatment of persons admitted to state institutions a misdemeanor, see § 25-01-16.

Location of deaf school, see N.D. Const., Art. IX, § 12.

Students may fish without license, see § 20.1-03-04.

Law Reviews.

Schools — Nature of the Right to Instruction — The Substantive Requirements of “Free Appropriate Public Education” Under the Education of All Handicapped Children Act of 1975, 59 N.D. L. Rev. 551 (1983).

25-07-01.1.
School for the deaf — Appointment of superintendent, budget, staff, and reporting structure.

The superintendent of the school for the deaf is appointed by and reports to the superintendent of public instruction. The school for the deaf must have a separate budget and separate staff from the department of public instruction.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 239, § 12.

25-07-02.
Superintendent — Special duties.

The superintendent of the school for the deaf may also act as superintendent of the North Dakota vision services — school for the blind.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 161, § 14; 1893, ch. 123, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 964; R.C. 1899, § 964; R.C. 1905, § 1145; C.L. 1913, § 1692; R.C. 1943, § 25-0702; S.L. 1971, ch. 274, § 1; 1989, ch. 339, § 2; 1991, ch. 297, § 1; 2001, ch. 257, § 6.

25-07-02.1.
Criminal history record checks.

The school for the deaf may require any employee, final applicant for employment, or any individual otherwise providing services to the school to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check. The nationwide criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner provided in section 12-60-24. The school for the deaf may assess all costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check to the individual upon whom the criminal history record check is conducted.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 100, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

25-07-03.
Matron — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 274, § 3.

25-07-04.
Qualifications for admission to school for the deaf — Residents of state entitled to free education.

A child who is a resident of this state and who, because of deafness or a hearing impairment, is unable to receive an education in the public schools, is entitled to attend the school for the deaf at the expense of the state. A child is entitled to attend the school at any age up to twenty-one.

The school for the deaf shall provide application forms upon request. A child may not be admitted to the school until the child’s application is completed and approved.

The school for the deaf shall provide transportation to any child who has been admitted, in accordance with the child’s individual education plan.

Any child who is a resident of this state and who is deaf or hearing impaired is entitled to receive special education and related services in accordance with the child’s individual education program. Each individual education program must address the child’s academic, recreational, and leisure needs, as well as the acquisition of independent living skills and career and technical education opportunities.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 161, § 10; R.C. 1895, § 960; R.C. 1899, § 960; R.C. 1905, § 1142; C.L. 1913, § 1689; R.C. 1943, § 25-0704; S.L. 1971, ch. 162, § 7; 1979, ch. 336, § 2; 1981, ch. 223, § 5; 1985, ch. 313, § 1; 1987, ch. 328, § 1; 1989, ch. 239, § 10; 1991, ch. 297, § 2; 2003, ch. 138, § 73; 2005, ch. 251, § 2.

25-07-05.
Admission of nonresidents.

A child who is deaf or hearing-impaired but who is not a resident of this state may be admitted to the school for the deaf, provided the annual cost of the child’s education, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, is paid on behalf of the child in advance of the child’s admission and on a yearly basis thereafter. The school may not admit a child who is not a resident of this state to the exclusion of a child who is a resident of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 161, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 959; R.C. 1899, § 959; R.C. 1905, § 1141; C.L. 1913, § 1688; R.C. 1943, § 25-0705; S.L. 1971, ch. 162, § 8; 1989, ch. 239, § 11; 2005, ch. 251, § 3.

25-07-06.
Instruction at school for the deaf.

The superintendent of the school for the deaf shall provide special education and related services designed to meet the unique needs of each child who is deaf or hearing impaired, in accordance with the child’s individual education program.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 161, § 14; 1893, ch. 123, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 964; R.C. 1899, § 964; R.C. 1905, § 1145; C.L. 1913, § 1692; R.C. 1943, § 25-0706; S.L. 1971, ch. 274, § 2; 1991, ch. 297, § 3, 2005, ch. 251 § 4.

25-07-07.
Transportation of indigent children to and from school for deaf. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 336, § 3.

25-07-08.
Clothing may be furnished when necessary — Accounts for clothing.

The school for the deaf shall provide clothing to a child who is enrolled in the school if the child does not have suitable clothing. If the child is a minor, the school shall charge the child’s parent or legal guardian for any clothing provided to the child under this section and shall charge the individual for any clothing provided to the individual under this section if the individual has reached the age of majority. If the superintendent certifies any charges under this section as being correct, the charges are presumed correct in all courts.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 161, § 12; R.C. 1895, § 962; R.C. 1899, § 962; R.C. 1905, § 1143; C.L. 1913, § 1690; R.C. 1943, § 25-0708; 2005, ch. 251, § 5.

25-07-09.
Collection of clothing account. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 106, § 18.

25-07-10.
Deaf persons — Duty to report.

It is the duty of every public school superintendent, physician, otologist, audiologist, nurse, clinic, hospital, and social and welfare agency in this state to report in writing to the superintendent of the North Dakota school for the deaf the name, age, and residence of persons under the age of twenty-one years who are deaf or hard of hearing, and in such cases to furnish such additional pertinent information as the superintendent of the North Dakota school for the deaf may request. All reports must be forwarded to said superintendent of the school for the deaf within thirty days after diagnosis, examination, or discovery.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 273, § 2.

25-07-11.
Home intervention program.

The school for the deaf may provide a home intervention program for children who are under the age of five and who are deaf or hearing impaired. The program must include information, counseling services, auditory training, and basic language development instruction for the parents of such children. This home intervention program must be carried out by college or university trained teachers of the deaf, speech pathologists, or audiologists.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 241, § 1; 2005, ch. 251, § 6.

25-07-12.
Provision of services — Collaboration — Competition.

The school for the deaf may collaborate with public and private entities for the provision of services to individuals who are deaf or hearing impaired. The school for the deaf may not compete with any public or private entity offering the same services within a region.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 251, § 7.

25-07-13.
School for the deaf fund.

The school for the deaf fund is a special fund in the state treasury. All moneys received pursuant to section 2 of article IX of the Constitution of North Dakota and all revenues received from the lease of buildings and the provision of meals and services, including interpreter services, must be deposited in the fund. Moneys in the fund are to be used pursuant to legislative appropriation for provision of services under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 12, § 25, effective July 1, 2017.